Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.400

Meat, fish, poultry to be sold by weight—Exceptions.

Except for immediate consumption on the premises where sold or as one of several elements comprising a meal sold as a unit, for consumption elsewhere than on the premises where sold, all meat, meat products, fish and poultry offered or exposed for sale or sold as food, unless otherwise provided for by the laws of the state of Washington, shall be offered or exposed for sale and sold by weight.

[ 1969 c 67 s 40.]